Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.024

Transition to director appointed commission.

To accomplish the transition to a commission structure where the director appoints a majority of commission members, the names of the currently elected commission members shall be forwarded to the director for appointment to the commission within thirty days of May 20, 2003. Thereafter, the director shall appoint commission members pursuant to RCW 15.28.023 as the current commission member terms expire.

[ 2003 c 396 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.